Montana, session 2025, HB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-38-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-38-202. Committee representatives as party representatives -- county and city central
committees. (1) Each committee representative shall represent the representative's political party for the
precinct in all ward or subdivision committees formed.
(2) The committee representatives in each precinct constitute the county central committee of the
respective political parties.
(3) Committee representatives who reside within the limits of a city are ex officio the city central
committee of their respective political parties and have the power to make their own rules not inconsistent with
those of the county central committee. However, the county central committee has the power to fill vacancies in
the city central committee.
(4) Each precinct committee representative serves a term of 2 years from the date of election or
appointment pursuant to 13-38-201. Once the term has expired, the position becomes vacant. The 2-year term
must commence on the date the election is certified BY THE COUNTY and conclude on the date the subsequent
election is certified BY THE COUNTY. In case of appointment, the term must conclude on the certification of the
next election pursuant to 13-38-201.
(5) Vacancies in the office of precinct committee representative occur only on the death or written
resignation of the incumbent or when the incumbent is no longer a resident or registered voter of the precinct. A
precinct committee representative may not otherwise be removed from office. If a vacancy occurs, the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 309

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0309.2
remaining members of the county central committee may select a precinct resident to fill the vacancy."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 309